Missouri, session 2026, SB1612.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.2542, to read as
follows:
173.2542. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Success for Homeless and Foster Youth in
Higher Education Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Foster youth", any individual in the care,
custody, or guardianship of the children's division of the
department of social services in the foster care program for
any six of the seventy-two months immediately prior to such
individual's eighteenth birthday;
(2) "Homeless youth", any individual under twenty-five
years of age who has been verified, at any time during the
six years prior to such individual's enrollment in an
institution, as a homeless child or youth as defined in 42
U.S.C. Section 11434a(2) by at least one of the following:
(a) A governmental or nonprofit agency that receives
federal, state, or municipal funding to provide services to

SB 1612 2
homeless persons or that is otherwise sanctioned to provide
these services by a homeless continuum of care organization;
(b) An attorney appointed by the court to represent
the youth;
(c) A local education agency liaison for homeless
children and youth designated as such pursuant to 42 U.S.C.
Section 11432(g)(1)(J)(ii) or a school social worker;
(d) A human services provider or public social
services provider funded by the state to provide services
for homeless children and youth, including health services,
mental or behavioral health services, substance use disorder
services, or public assistance or employment services;
(e) A law enforcement officer designated as a liaison
to the homeless population by a law enforcement agency or
department within the state;
(f) The director of a federal TRIO program or his
designee;
(g) A court-appointed special advocate (CASA) employee
or volunteer;
(h) A financial aid administrator;
(i) An admissions counselor;
(3) "Institution", a public institution of higher
education that is subject to the coordinating board for
higher education under section 173.005.
3. Each institution shall designate a homeless and
foster student liaison within such institution's financial
aid office. The liaison shall be responsible for applying
the provisions of the federal Higher Education Act as set
forth in 20 U.S.C. Section 1070, et seq., pertaining to the
independent student status and financial aid eligibility of
current and former homeless youth and foster youth, and
shall assist these students, both current and prospective,

SB 1612 3
in applying for federal and state financial aid and other
assistance for which they may be eligible.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, an institution may grant resident status to a
student who resides in Missouri and is nineteen years of age
or under at the time of enrollment, regardless of how long
such student has resided in the state, if such student is
determined to have been homeless at any time during the two
years immediately preceding such student's enrollment.
5. In order to ensure that current and former homeless
youth and foster youth have access to stable housing, an
institution that offers student housing may develop a plan
to provide that students who are homeless youth or foster
youth have access to housing resources as needed during and
between academic terms. The plan may grant such students
first priority for housing placement and provide that they
be placed in the institution's housing facility that remains
open for occupation during the most days in a calendar year.
✓